Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.460

Structural pest inspector—Evidence of financial responsibility required—Exemptions.

(1) The director shall not issue a license to any individual who intends to act as a structural pest inspector until evidence of financial responsibility, required and described in subsection (2) of this section, is furnished by the applicant or the business employing the applicant. Licensed commercial applicators that have met the requirements of RCW 17.21.160 and their licensed commercial operator employees are exempt from this financial responsibility requirement when performing specific wood destroying organism inspections. Public employees licensed to perform structural pest inspections are exempt from this licensing requirement when acting within their official capacities.

(2) Evidence of financial responsibility, consisting of one of the following, must be provided and maintained as a condition of licensure:

(a) An errors and omissions insurance policy, the amount and terms of which are consistent with the requirements of RCW 15.58.465(1)(a);

(b) A surety bond, the amounts and terms of which are consistent with the requirements of RCW 15.58.465(1)(b);

(c) A surety bond and an errors and omissions insurance policy, the amount and terms of which are consistent with the requirements of RCW 15.58.465(1)(c);

(d) An assigned account, the amount and terms of which are consistent with the requirements of RCW 15.58.465(1)(d);

(e) Any other type of evidence of financial responsibility identified by the director by rule that provides coverage equivalent to that provided by any of (a) through (d) of this subsection.

(3) Evidence of financial responsibility must be supplied to the department on a financial responsibility insurance certificate, surety bond form, assigned account form, or other form prescribed by the director with regard to evidence provided under subsection (2)(e) of this section.

[ 2003 c 212 s 9; 2000 c 96 s 3.]